Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 46 Rhode Island Salvage Law

31-46-1.
Duty of insurance company and salvage motor vehicle dealer.

Any insurance company taking possession of a motor vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued in this state, that has been declared a total loss because of damage to that vehicle, in settlement of a claim for damage or theft shall within ten (10) days deliver to the division of motor vehicles the certificate of title of that vehicle and obtain a salvage certificate of title for that vehicle as prescribed for by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. If the insurance company is unable to obtain the certificate of title of the vehicle for more than thirty (30) days after payment of the total loss claim on the vehicle, the insurance company or its agent may apply for and obtain, free and clear of all liens and claims of ownership, a salvage certificate of title in the insurance company’s name without delivering the certificate of title to the division of motor vehicles. The application shall be accompanied by evidence that the insurance company has paid a total loss claim on the vehicle and has attempted to obtain the certificate of title by sending at least two (2) written attempts, sent by certified mail or by another commercially available delivery service providing proof of delivery and addressed to the last known owner of the vehicle and any known lienholders, at the address shown on the records of the appropriate registry, in the state in which the vehicle is registered.

If:

A motor vehicle dealer, the primary business of which is the sale of salvage motor vehicles on behalf of insurance companies, is asked by an insurance company to take possession of a motor vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued in this state;

The motor vehicle is the subject of an insurance claim; and

Subsequently a total loss claim is not paid by the insurance company with respect to the motor vehicle, the motor vehicle dealer may, if the motor vehicle has been abandoned at the facility of the motor vehicle dealer for more than thirty (30) days, apply for and obtain, free and clear of all liens and claims of ownership, a salvage certificate of title in the dealer’s name without surrendering the certificate of title to the division of motor vehicles. The application shall be accompanied by evidence that the motor vehicle dealer made at least two (2) written attempts, sent by certified mail or by another commercially available delivery service providing proof of delivery and addressed to the last known owner of the vehicle and any known lienholders, at the address shown on the records of the appropriate registry, in the state in which the vehicle is registered, to have the vehicle removed from the motor vehicle dealer’s facility. In such application, the motor vehicle dealer shall also classify the vehicle as Classification A or Classification B, as the classifications are described in §

31-46-1.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 423, § 1, effective July 20, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 424, § 1, effective July 20, 2021.

31-46-1.1.
Classification of salvage vehicles.

There shall be two (2) classifications of salvage vehicles: Classification A indicates the vehicle has extensive damage and is good for “parts only.” Classification B indicates the vehicle has considerable damage but is considered repairable. It will be the responsibility of insurance companies to evaluate and classify salvage. The classification is subject to review and evaluation by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or his or her designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 3.

31-46-2.
Salvage by insurer.

If the insurance company sells the motor vehicle for any reason, it shall make application for a salvage certificate of title. The division of motor vehicles shall issue the salvage certificate of title on a form prescribed for by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, that shall be of a color easily distinguished from the original certificate of title, and shall bear the same number and information as the original certificate of title. The salvage certificate of title shall be assigned by the insurance company to a salvage dealer or any other person for use as evidence of ownership upon the sale or other disposition of the salvage motor vehicle, and the title shall be assignable to any other person. The division of motor vehicles shall charge the insurance company a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the cost of processing each salvage certificate title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 15, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 4.

31-46-3.
Salvage by non-insurer.

If the total cost of repairs to rebuild or reconstruct the motor vehicle to its condition immediately before it was wrecked, destroyed or damaged, and for legal operations on the roads or highways, exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the fair market value of the motor vehicle immediately preceding the time it was wrecked, destroyed or damaged, and the motor vehicle is less than seven (7) years beyond the date of manufacture, the owner shall return within ten (10) days to the division of motor vehicles, the certificate of title of that vehicle and obtain a salvage certificate of title for that vehicle as prescribed for by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. For the purposes of this section, “fair market value” shall mean the retail value of a motor vehicle as set forth in a current edition of any nationally recognized compilation of retail values, including automated databases, or from publications commonly used by the automotive industry to establish the values of motor vehicles, or determined pursuant to market survey of comparable vehicles with regard to condition and equipment. If any person, individual, or corporation or other owner sells the motor vehicle for any reason, that owner shall make application for a salvage certificate of title. The division of motor vehicles shall issue the salvage certificate of title on a form prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles that shall be of a color easily distinguished from the original certificate of title and shall bear the same number and information as the original certificate of title. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall charge the owner a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the cost of processing each salvage certificate of title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 15, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 385, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 489, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 4.

31-46-4.
Restoration.

If a motor vehicle is restored for operation on the highways, application shall be made to the division of motor vehicles for a certificate of title. Upon inspection by the division of motor vehicles, which shall include establishing proof of ownership, and upon the surrender of the salvage certificate of title, the division of motor vehicles shall issue a certificate of title for a fee prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The certificate of title shall be in the same form and color as the original certificate and bear the same number as the salvage certificate and the original certificate and shall bear the word “re-constructed salvage” on the title. A fee of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) shall be assessed for each inspection made pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 69, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 108, § 1.

31-46-5.
Penalties.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 144, § 1.

31-46-6.
Removal of vehicle identification number prohibited.

Under no circumstances shall any person intentionally remove any vehicle identification number, or other distinguishing number, from any part of a salvage motor vehicle, new or used, or any part of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 3.

31-46-7.
Repair of salvaged vehicles — Licenses.

A salvage rebuilders’ license shall be established and issued to all licensed auto body repair facilities that qualify under established guidelines. The regulations shall outline equipment and training necessary to rebuild (total loss) salvage vehicles prior to the issuance of a certificate of salvage title by the division of motor vehicles under §

31-46-4

. The guidelines shall be promulgated by and the license shall be issued by the department of business regulation.

No company, corporation, business or person(s) shall rebuild salvage vehicles unless in possession of a valid salvage rebuilders license.

Any vehicle repaired or rebuilt by person(s) not in possession of this license shall have its title stamped “FOR PARTS ONLY”.

Any company, agency or person(s) found in violation of this section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

The director of the department of business regulation shall be required to issue a “salvage rebuilders license form” which for the purposes of record keeping shall be numbered. Any salvage vehicle sold to a salvage rebuilder licensee shall be assigned a salvage rebuilders license form which shall be presented at the time of registration of any salvage vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 205, § 1.